Hawaii, session 2026, HB1613.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the Hawaii technology development corporation's statutory mandate includes facilitating the growth of the technology industry, supporting startups, developing technology infrastructure, encouraging commercialization, coordinating statewide innovation efforts, and promoting Hawaii as a location for technology-based economic activity. The legislature adopted House Concurrent Resolution No. 156, Regular Session of 2025, requesting the Hawaii technology development corporation to increase its focus on advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity to build a stronger, diversified economy, create high-wage job opportunities, and position Hawaii as a leader in innovation and national security in the Pacific.  The legislature also adopted House Resolution No. 67, Regular Session of 2025, requesting the department of education and university of Hawaii to assess the criteria required to establish an educational pipeline and curriculum to ensure that students acquire skills in advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity. These measures reflect the legislature's recognition that advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity are critical enablers of economic resilience, supply chain security, workforce development, and national competitiveness. The legislature further finds that the Hawaii technology development corporation previously relied on federal funding through the National Institute of Standards and Technology's Manufacturing Extension Partnership to support advanced manufacturing initiatives statewide. With the termination of this funding, the Hawaii technology development corporation lacks sufficient internal capacity to continue these efforts, respond to legislative direction, and support Hawaii manufacturers, defense-adjacent industries, and emerging technology companies. The legislature also finds that effective ecosystem development also requires sustained investment in marketing, branding, and outreach to increase awareness of Hawaii's technology programs, attract talent and investment, and ensure participation across all islands. The purpose of this Act is to strengthen Hawaii's technology and innovation ecosystem by appropriating funds to establish advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity specialist and marketing and branding specialist positions. SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii technology development corporation to establish      full‑time equivalent (     FTE) permanent advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity specialist position to lead statewide initiatives, including but not limited to: (1)  Supporting activities formerly funded through the National Institute of Standards and Technology's Manufacturing Extension Partnership; (2)  Advancing legislative priorities related to advanced manufacturing and cybersecurity, including ecosystem coordination and industry support; (3)  Providing technical assistance to Hawaii manufacturers, suppliers, and technology companies to improve productivity, security, and resilience; and (4)  Supporting workforce development, cybersecurity readiness, and federal grant competitiveness in advanced manufacturing and related sectors. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii technology development corporation to establish      full‑time equivalent (     FTE) permanent marketing and branding specialist position to support the development corporation's strategic plan, including but not limited to: (1)  Marketing technology programs, facilities, and funding opportunities administered or supported by the development corporation; (2)  Developing and managing statewide branding efforts to strengthen Hawaii's technology and innovation ecosystem; (3)  Managing public information, outreach, communications, and stakeholder engagement; (4)  Supporting conferences, events, talent-attraction initiatives, and ecosystem convenings; and (5)  Advancing the objectives of the development corporation's strategic plan and legislative priorities. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii technology development corporation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3050.